Illinois, session 104th, HB3214.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Section 11-5.6 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/11-5.6 new)7    Sec. 11-5.6. Medicare Part A Buy-In Agreement Report. The 8Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall study the 9impact to the State and recipients of entering into a Medicare 10Part A Buy-In Agreement for qualified Medicare beneficiaries 11with the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.12    The Department shall prepare a report about executing a 13Medicare Part A Buy-In Agreement. The report shall reflect 14that it is the policy of the State of Illinois to reduce 15administrative burden to applicants and recipients in programs 16under this Code, and to promote the health, well-being, and 17economic security of low-income older adults and people with 18disabilities in its medical programs. As part of studying the 19impact, the Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall 20consult with the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 21Services and relevant State agencies, including the Department 22on Aging, and conduct stakeholder engagement.23    The report shall outline the methodology used by the   HB3214 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10744 KTG 20823 b1Department of Healthcare and Family Services and shall include 2relevant findings, including potential cost savings to 3recipients and reductions in administrative burden, and a 4synopsis of discussions with interested stakeholders. The 5report shall contain recommendations for further action to 6facilitate accountability and to achieve the policy objectives 7outlined in this Section. The report shall be completed and 8posted on the Department's website by no later July 1, 2026 and 9a copy of the report shall be sent to the Secretary of Human 10Services and other relevant stakeholders.11    For the purposes of this Section, "Medicare Part A Buy-In 12Agreement" means an agreement authorized by Section 1395v of 13Title 42 of the United States Code under which the State shall 14pay Medicare Part A premiums for qualified individuals who are 15enrolled in both the Medicare Program and the State Medicaid 16program. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.